src/fst/phonology.twolc
! ! acc.pl # to make sure VH still works otherwise
! !!€ sábme^WG^IJ>jd
! !!€ sä0mi000jd



"Default UA in G3" ! u^O:ua (juallgáj, luakkta); always with word-initial C
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%^O:a <=> Cns:* u _ G3 [:a|:o|:y|:ä|:å|:á] \%^WG: ; 
          Cns:* u _ noCG [:a|:o|:y|:ä|:å|:á] Cns:* %^G3:* %^UAUML: ;

! added Cns:* before G3/UAUML for odd verbs with C after V2
!!€ lu^Oddan^UAUMLi%>t
!!€ luaddan0i0t

"Special UÄ (VH) in G3" ! u^O:ua (juällge); always with word-initial C
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%^O:ä <=> Cns:* u _ G3 :e \%^WG: ; 
          Cns:* u _ Cns:+ :e (j:j) %^G3: ; ! duädde<->duodde, guäddej<->guäddeja
          Cns:* u _ noCG :e Cns: %^UAUML: ; ! tjuädtjelit (not tjuodtjelit)

!!€ gu^Odde^G3%>t
!!€ guädde00t

!!€ gu^Odde^G3%>t
!!€ guädde00t


! !!€ nju^Onnje^UAUML
! !!€ njuonnje0
! !!€ nju^Onnje^WG
! !!€ njuon0je0

"Special VH for u^O" ! u^O:u0
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%^O:0 <=> Cns:* u _ Cns:+ VHtrig Cns:* Dummy:* %>:* ; !juällge<->julgij

"Special VH for ie" ! ie:0e
!! **@RULENAME@**  
i:0 <=> Cns:* _ e: Cns:+ VHtrig Cns:* Dummy:* Vow:* %>: ; !iello->0elluj
		Cns:* _ e: G3 Vow: \%^WG: ; !biebbmo->b0äbbmo, häg'ga->hiegga, siebla<->säbblag-
		Cns:* _ e: Cns:+ Vow:+ %^G3: ; !biegga->b0ägga
		Cns:* _ e: noCG Vow: \%^WG: \%^WG: ; !bierdna->b0ärdna !double \%^WG: for gierbma<->gärbmaha  (ie: neither of the two elements after V2 can be ^WG)

!!€ sjievdnje^IJ%>s
!!€ sj0evdnji00s

!!€ hierrge^WG^IJ%>j
!!€ h0er0gi000j

!!€ hierrge%>j^V2E2AA
!!€ h0ärrgá0j0

		
"Ä in G3" ! ie:0ä (bägga, bävvde); not word-initial (thus not capitalized)
!! **@RULENAME@**  
e:ä <=> Cns:* i:0 _ G3 noVHtrig \%^WG: ; !biebbmo->b0äbbmo
        Cns:* i:0 _ Cns:+ noVHtrig %^G3: ; !biegga->b0ägga
		Cns:* i:0 _ noCG noVHtrig \%^WG: ; !bierdna->b0ärdna 
			!problem: lieggadit -> *läggadit (currently solved with quickNdirty manual addition of ^WG to affected lexemes, but this is not a good permanent solution)

"Ä in G3 capitalized" ! Ie:0Ä (Änntse->Ientse), eg. proper nouns with word-initial capitalization
!! **@RULENAME@**  
e:Ä <=> I:0 _ G3 noVHtrig \%^WG: ; !Änntse->Ientse


! !!€ tjalmed%>ibme^WG
! !!€ tjalmed0i0me0

! !!€ dibme^WG
! !!€ di0me0


! !!€ vu^Os'sa^WG
! !!€ vuos0sa0

! !!€ fiede^G3^UAUML>0
! !!€ f0äde00>0
! !!€ fiede^WG>v
! !!€ fiede0>v
! !!€ fiede^WG^IJ>jn
! !!€ f0edi00>jn

! !!€ gierbmah^WG^CDEL>0
! !!€ gierbma00000
! !!€ gierbmaha>v
! !!€ g0ärbmaha>v

! !!€ bierdne^WGs>0
! !!€ bierdne0s>0
! !!€ bierdná>v
! !!€ b0ärdná>v

! !!€ ku^Ordna^UAUML
! !!€ kuardna0
! !!€ ku^Ordna^WG
! !!€ kuordna0

! !!€ hieg'ga^UAUML
! !!€ h0äg0ga0
! !!€ hieg'ga^WG
! !!€ hieg0ga0
! !!€ hieg'ga>j^V2E2AA
! !!€ h0äg0ga0j0
! 
! !!€ biebbmo^UAUML
! !!€ b0äbbmo0
! !!€ biebbmo^WG
! !!€ bieb0mo0
! 
! !!€ bievvde^WG
! !!€ biev0de0
! !!€ bievvde^UAUML
! !!€ b0ävvde0
! !!€ biegga^G3^UAUML
! !!€ b0ägga00
! !!€ biegga^WG
! !!€ biegga0

! !!€ rággas
! !!€ rággas
! !!€ rággasa>v 
! !!€ rággasa0v 


"V2 E to I before j-suffixes" ! guolle -> gulij
!! **@RULENAME@**  
e:i <=> Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (Dummy:) %^IJ:0 ; !guolle<->gulij juällge<->julgij sábme<->sämij

"V2 E to Á" ! juällge->juallgáj, sábme->sábmáj, guolle->guolá>tj, vágge->vággáj, båhtet->bådáv
!! **@RULENAME@**  
e:á <=> Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (%^G3:0) (%^WG:0) %>:+ (V2E2AAtrig) %^V2E2AA:0 ;

!!€ båhte^WG%>v^V2E2AA
!!€ bå0dá00v0
!!€ båhte^WG%>^V2E2AA
!!€ bå0dá000
!!€ máhtte^WG%>v^V2E2AA
!!€ máht0á00v0
!!€ máhtte^WG%>^V2E2AA
!!€ máht0á000


"V2 E to Á before S or R" ! åres->årrás-, tjåskes->tjåsskas-, fieber fiebár-
!! **@RULENAME@**  
e:á <=> Vow:+ Cns:+ _ [s|r] %^V2E2AA:0 ;

"V2 O to U" ! rássjo->rässjuj, iello->elluj (variant), ålol<-ullul-
!! **@RULENAME@**  
o:u <=> Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (Dummy:*) %>:+ Cns:+ %^V2O2U:0 ;
		Vow:+ Cns:+ _ Cns:+ %^V2O2U:0 %>:* Vow:+ ; ! turns SUPERL -ubmos- into -ubmusa

! !!€ mu^Ohttag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ muoht0a000
! ! vielmes:vielbm N_CONTR_ESAA
! ! nom.sg
! !!€ vielbme^WGs
! !!€ viel0me0s
! ! acc.sg
! !!€ vielbmáv
! !!€ v0älbmáv

"Final V Deletion" !gåjjkebärrgo -> gåjjkbärrgo; gájka -> gájk
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Vx:0 <=> [#|.#.] (Cns:) Vow:+ Cns:+ _ (%^WG:) %^VDEL: # ;
	where Vx in ( e a ) ; !add more Vs as needed







! !nom.sg
! !!€ almatj
! !!€ almatj
! !nom.pl
! !!€ almatja
! !!€ almatja
! !acc.sg
! !!€ almatja%>v
! !!€ almatja0v
! !acc.pl
! !!€ almatji2%>j
! !!€ almatj0i0j
! 
! 
! !nom.sg
! !!€ biednag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ bie0na000
! !nom.pl
! !!€ biednaga
! !!€ biednaga
! !acc.sg
! !!€ biednaga%>v
! !!€ biednaga0v
! !acc.pl
! !!€ biednagi2%>j
! !!€ biednag0i0j
! 
! !!€ båhtsoj^WG
! !!€ bå0tsoj0
! !!€ båhtsu
! !!€ buhtsu
! !!€ båhtsu%>v
! !!€ buhtsu0v



! !!€ ålbmaj^WG
! !!€ ål0maj0
! !!€ ålbma>v
! !!€ ålbma0v
! !!€ ålbma>j
! !!€ ålbma0j

! !!€ ållol^WG
! !!€ ål0ol0
! !!€ ållol^V2O2Ua>v
! !!€ ullul0a0v
! !!€ ållol^V2O2Ui2>j
! !!€ ullul00i0j
! !!€ rássjo>j^V2O2U
! !!€ rässju0j0
! !!€ rássjo>j^V2E2AA
! !!€ rássjo0j0

! ! gen.pl
! !!€ ju^Ollge^WG^IJ>j
! !!€ ju0l0gi000j
! ! ill.sg
! !!€ ju^Ollge^UAUML>j^V2E2AA
! !!€ juallgá00j0
! ! nom.sg
! !!€ ju^Ollge^UAUML
! !!€ juällge0
! ! nom.pl
! !!€ ju^Ollge^WG
! !!€ juol0ge0

! !!€ sábme>j^V2E2AA
! !!€ sábmá0j0
! !!€ sábme^WG^IJ>j
! !!€ sä0mi000j
! !!€ iello^WG^IJ>j
! !!€ iel0o000j
! !!€ ållge^WG
! !!€ ål0ge0
! !!€ lu^Okkta^UAUML
! !!€ luakkta0
! !!€ bievvde^UAUML
! !!€ b0ävvde0

! !!€ vadnas^WG
! !!€ va0nas0
! !!€ gu^Ohtom
! !!€ guohtom
! !!€ buvdna^WG
! !!€ buv0na0
! ! fake word!
! !!€ skåldnjeg^WG^CDEL
! !!€ skål0nje000
! !!€ dållå^WG
! !!€ dål0å0
! ! suoŋŋer:suoŋŋer N_ODD ;
! !!€ suoŋŋer^WG
! !!€ suoŋ0er0
! ! tjála:tjállag BIENA "skrift" ;
! !!€ tjállag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ tjál0a000

! !!€ árrad2
! !!€ árrat
! !!€ árrad2e
! !!€ árrade
! !!€ unneb2
! !!€ unnep
! !!€ vájbmo^WG
! !!€ váj0mo0
! !!€ dåhpe^WG
! !!€ då0be0
! !!€ råhtje^WG
! !!€ rå0tje0
! !!€ råhtse^WG
! !!€ rå0tse0
! !!€ dåhpe^WG
! !!€ då0be0
! !!€ råhtje^WG
! !!€ rå0tje0
! !!€ riehpeh^WG^CDEL
! !!€ rie0be000
! !!€ biednag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ bie0na000
! !!€ lu^Okkta^WG
! !!€ luok0ta0
! ! fake word:
! !!€ lu^Okktag^WG^CDEL
! !!€ luok0ta000
! ! fake word:
! !!€ fábmog^WG^CDEL
! !!€ fá0mo000

!!€ a
!!€ b
